src/fst/phonology.twolc
Alphabet

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z å ä ö
ng
e2
%^IAU:i
%^IEI:i
%^ÅIÅ:å
%^IMP:0
%> ;


Sets

Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ng ;
Vow = a e i o u y å ä ö ;
Voiced = b g d ;
Unvoiced = p k t s ;
Nas = n m ;

Rules 

"Vowel-initial suffixes"
e:0 <=> Vow %> _ ;

"Save some (+N+Neu) suffix-intital e"
e2:e <=> Vow %> _ ;

!"avljud hinna - hann - hunnit: +Inf, +Prs"
!%^IAU:i <=> _ [n g | Nas:+] %> a # ; 
!            _ [n g | Nas:+] %> e r # ;

"avljud hinna - hann - hunnit: +Prt"
%^IAU:a <=> _ [n g | Nas:+] # ;

"avljud hinna - hann - hunnit: +Sup, +PrfPtc"
%^IAU:u <=> _ [n g | Nas:+] %> i t # ;
            _ [n g | Nas:+] %> e n # ;


!"avljud skriva - skrev - skrivit: +Inf, +Prs, +Sup, +PrfPtc"
!%^IEI:i <=> _ Cns %> a # ; 
!            _ Cns %> e r # ;
!            _ Cns %> i t # ;
!            _ Cns %> e n # ;

"avljud skriva - skrev - skrivit: +Prt"
%^IEI:e <=> _ Cns # ;

!"avljud få - fick - fått: +Inf, +Prs"
!%^ÅIÅ:å <=> _ %> [ r | t t | d d] # ; 
!            _ # ;

"avljud gå - gick - gått: +Prt"
%^ÅIÅ:i <=> _ %> c k # ; 
